Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-801
State officers; deputies; appointment; bond or insurance.

The Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, and State Librarian respectively, may appoint a deputy for whose acts he or she shall be responsible. The appointment shall be in writing and shall be revocable in writing by the principal. The deputy shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. Both the appointment and revocation shall be filed and kept by the principal.

R.S.1866, c. 15, § 1, p. 127;

R.S.1913, § 5735;

C.S.1922, § 5064;

C.S.1929, § 84-801;

R.S.1943, § 84-801;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 39;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 52;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 53.